Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6713XS (2) 91 da/js S.F. 2193 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 455B.211A Perfluoroalkyl or 1 polyfluoroalkyl substances. 2 A waste water treatment plant shall conduct a test of 3 sewage sludge to detect the presence of a perfluoroalkyl or 4 polyfluoroalkyl substance prior to providing the sewage sludge 5 for application on land used for farming. If the test detects 6 the presence of a perfluoroalkyl or polyfluoroalkyl substance, 7 the waste water treatment plant shall deliver a written notice 8 of the test results to the owner of the land where the sewage 9 sludge is to be applied. The owner may refuse to accept the 10 sewage sludge without legal consequence. 11